North Carolina statutes. Chapter 113A. Pollution Control and Environment.
Article 11. Forest Development Act. [Repealed]

§§ 113A-176 through 113A-183.

Recodified as Article 83 of Chapter 106,

G.S. 106-1010

through

G.S. 106-1018

, by Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.25(gg), effective July 1, 2011.

§§ 113A-184 through 113A-188.

Reserved for future codification purposes.